Oklahoma, session 2025, SB830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 30.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 30.1. A. There is hereby established an intermediate


appellate court to be known as the Court of Civil Appeals of the


State of Oklahoma which shall have the power to determine or


otherwise dispose of any cases that are assigned to it by the


Supreme Court properly before the court. Its decisions, when final,


shall neither not be appealable to the Supreme Court nor be subject

Req. No. 1318 Page 1


to reexamination by another division of the Court of Civil Appeals


or by the Judges of that Court sitting en banc except upon


certiorari as provided in this section.


B. The Court of Civil Appeals shall have jurisdiction to issue


writs of habeas corpus, mandamus, quo warranto, certiorari,


prohibition, or any other process when this may be necessary in any


case assigned to it by the Supreme Court properly before the court.


C. On and after the effective date of this act, the Supreme


Court shall assign every appeal of a district court decision, except


for criminal cases appealed to the Court of Criminal Appeals as


provided by law, to the Court of Civil Appeals. The Supreme Court


shall not retain any appeal of a district court decision and shall


not have discretion in whether to assign an appeal to the Court of


Civil Appeals. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter


the original jurisdiction of the Supreme Court.


D. A decision of the Court of Civil Appeals may only be


reviewed by the Supreme Court if a majority of its Justices direct


that a writ of certiorari be granted, and the. The Supreme Court


may, by order, shall not recall a case from assigned to the Court of


Civil Appeals.


E. In every appeal the Supreme Court reviews pursuant to a


grant of certiorari, each party shall have the right to submit a


timely brief and to present oral argument unless all parties


expressly waive one or both rights.

Req. No. 1318 Page 2


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1318 TEK 1/19/2025 5:44:16 AM











































Req. No. 1318 Page 3